Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Commissioner
§ 26-2-122.
Examinations; expense.

The reasonable and proper expense of examination of an insurer or of any person referred to in W.S. 26-2-117(a)(ii) or (iv) shall be borne by the person examined, unless the expense has been otherwise provided for by the insurer having paid the assessment established by W.S.

26-2-204

. The expense shall include the reasonable and proper expenses of the commissioner and his examiners, and a reasonable per diem as to such examiners, as necessarily incurred in the examination.

The person examined shall promptly pay the examination expense upon the commissioner’s presentation of a reasonably detailed written account thereof. The commissioner shall file a copy of the account in the department as a public record.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 146, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-301; C.S. 1945, § 52-201; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-48, 26.1-38; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 38; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1988, ch. 62, § 2.

Applied

in

Wyoming Ins. Dep't v. Sierra Life Ins. Co., 599 P.2d 1360,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 453

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 26-2-123.
Witnesses; evidence; subpoenas.

In any examination or investigation the department conducts, the commissioner or any representative he appoints may:

Administer oaths and affirmations;

Examine and cross-examine witnesses;

Receive oral and documentary evidence;

Subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance and testimony; and

Require by subpoena the production of any books, papers, records, files, correspondence, documents and other evidence deemed relevant to the inquiry whether under control of the department, the insurer or other persons.

If any individual refuses to comply with any subpoena or to testify as to any matter concerning which he is lawfully interrogated, the district court of the county in which the examination or investigation is being conducted or in which the individual resides or may be found, on the commissioner’s application, may issue an order requiring the individual to comply with the subpoena and testify or produce the evidence subpoenaed. Failure to obey a court order may be punished by the court as contempt.

Subpoenas shall be served and proof of service made in the same manner as if issued by a district court. Witness fees and mileage, if claimed, shall be allowed the same as for testimony in court.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 146, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-301; C.S. 1945, § 52-201; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-48, 26.1-39; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 39; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1993, ch. 134, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision as to witness fees and mileage, see §

1-14-102

.

During investigative stage, commissioner may exercise subpoena powers ex parte

to determine whether or not a complaint should be issued. Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 26-2-124.
Immunity from prosecution when testimony is compelled; exception for perjury; waiver of immunity.

If any person asks to be excused from attending or testifying or from producing any books, papers, records, correspondence, documents or other evidence in connection with any examination, investigation or hearing the commissioner or his representative conducts, or in any proceeding or action before any court or magistrate upon a charge of violation of this code [title 26], on the ground that the testimony or evidence required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture, and, notwithstanding, is directed by the commissioner and the attorney general to give the testimony or produce the evidence, he shall comply with that direction. The person shall not thereafter be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or because of any transaction, matter or thing concerning which he may have testified or produced evidence, and no testimony given or evidence produced shall be received against him upon any criminal action, investigation or proceeding, except that no person so testifying is exempt from prosecution or punishment for perjury.

Any person may execute, acknowledge and file in the department a statement expressly waiving the immunity or privilege in respect to any transaction, matter or thing specified in the statement. The testimony of that person or the evidence in relation to the transaction, matter or thing may then be received or produced before any judge or justice, court, tribunal, magistrate, grand jury or otherwise, and if so received or produced the person is not entitled to any immunity or privileges because of any testimony he gives or evidence he produces.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 19; R.S. 1931, § 57-219; C.S. 1945, § 52-407; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-60, 26.1-40; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 40; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cited

in

Hall v. State, 851 P.2d 1262,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For casenote, “Criminal Procedure — Witness Immunity — The Story of a County Attorney Who Said, ‘I Think I Can, I Think I Can,’ and the Brave Little Conscience that Couldn't be
Shocked. Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1990),” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 191 (1992).

§ 26-2-125.
Commissioner's hearings; generally; when required; request for hearing; stay.

The commissioner may hold a hearing without request by others for any purpose within the scope of this code [title 26].

The commissioner shall hold a hearing:

If required by this code or the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

]; or

Upon written request therefor by a person aggrieved by any act, threatened act or failure of the commissioner to act, or by any report, rule, regulation or order of the commissioner, other than an order for the holding of a hearing, or an order on a hearing or pursuant to the order, of which the person had notice.

Any request for hearing shall be filed in the department within ninety (90) days after the person knows or reasonably should know of the act, threatened act, failure, report or order, unless a different period is provided for by other laws applicable to a particular matter, in which case the other law governs. A hearing as to the legality of a rule or regulation may be requested within ninety (90) days after the person knows or reasonably should know of the application or proposed application of the rule or regulation as to the person in a particular instance.

Any request for hearing shall summarize the information and grounds to be relied upon as a basis for the relief to be sought at the hearing.

If the commissioner finds that the request is made in good faith, that the person would be aggrieved if his grounds are established and that the grounds otherwise justify the hearing, he shall hold the hearing within thirty (30) days from the date the request is filed, unless postponed by mutual consent. Failure to hold the hearing upon request of a person entitled thereto as provided in this section constitutes a denial of the relief sought and is the equivalent of a final order of the commissioner for the purpose of an appeal under W.S.

26-2-129

.

Any request for hearing the commissioner receives prior to the effective date of action he takes or proposes to take stays the action pending the hearing, except as to action taken or proposed under an order:

On hearing;

Pursuant to an order on hearing;

To make good an impairment of the capital funds of an insurer; or

Made pursuant to chapter 14 of this code.

If an automatic stay is not provided for, and if the commissioner after written request therefor fails to grant a stay, the person aggrieved may apply to the district court of Laramie county for a stay of the commissioner’s action.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-41; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Improper to grant injunctive relief requested by commissioner until parties' obligations ascertained. —

It would be improper to grant certain injunctive relief requested by the insurance commissioner, i.e., the direct payment of the tax debt of an unknown amount for certain years, the direct report of the proportion of the premiums collected on persons, subjects or risks located or resident in Wyoming and covered by policies in which such risks are in more than one state, and the payment of fines as civil penalties, where the obligation for the payment of such taxes has not been ascertained and the companies involved have not been requested to make the designated reports or pay the taxes. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 26-2-126.
Commissioner's hearings; notice of hearing; contents; delivery.

Unless a longer period is expressly provided in this code [title 26], the commissioner shall give written notice of the hearing not less than ten (10) days in advance. If the persons to be given notice are not specified in the provision pursuant to which the hearing is held, the commissioner shall give notice to all persons whose financial interests the hearing directly and immediately affects.

If any person is entitled to a hearing by any provision of law before any proposed action is taken, the notice of the hearing may be in the form of a notice to show cause stating:

That the proposed action may be taken unless the person shows cause at a hearing to be held as specified in the notice why the proposed action should not be taken; and

The basis of the proposed action.

Notice of hearing shall otherwise be in accordance with W.S.

16-3-107

, except that mailed notice is deemed to have been served when addressed to the person to be notified at his address last of record with the department and deposited, postage paid, in a mail depository of the United States post office.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 42; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-42; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-2-127.
Commissioner's hearings; procedure.

The commissioner shall allow any party to the hearing to:

Appear in person and by counsel;

Be present during the giving of all evidence;

Have a reasonable opportunity to inspect all documentary and other evidence;

Examine and cross-examine witnesses;

Present evidence in support of his interest; and

Have subpoenas issued by the commissioner to compel attendance of witnesses and production of evidence in his behalf.

Upon good cause shown the commissioner shall permit to become a party to the hearing by intervention, if timely, only those persons who were not original parties thereto and whose pecuniary interests are to be directly and immediately affected by the commissioner’s order made upon the hearing.

Hearings in other respects are subject to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] as to contested cases.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 43; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-43; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-2-128.
Commissioner's hearings; commissioner's orders after hearing.

Within thirty (30) days after termination of a hearing, or within sixty (60) days after termination if a transcript of the proceedings is to be made, or of any rehearing or reargument thereof, or within any other period as may be specified in this code [title 26] as to particular matters, or within any further period to which the parties consent in writing, the commissioner shall make and enter his order on hearing. Failure of the commissioner to make and enter his order within the period allowed is deemed a denial of the petition, relief or application as to which the hearing was held.

The commissioner shall promptly give a copy of the order to each party to the hearing in the same manner as notice of the hearing was given, except that as to hearings held concerning merger, consolidation, bulk reinsurance or conversion of a domestic insurer as provided for in chapter 24 or in chapter 27 of this code, if notice of the hearing was mailed or given to all stockholders or policyholders, or both, of the insurer or insurers involved, the commissioner is required to give a copy of the order to the corporate or insurer parties, to intervening parties, to a reasonable number of the stockholders or policyholders as representative of the class and to other parties only upon written request of those parties.

The orders are otherwise subject to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] as in contested cases.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 44; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-44; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-2-129.
Commissioner's hearings; appeals; procedure; injunctions.

An appeal shall be taken only:

From the commissioner’s order on hearing; or

As to a matter on which the commissioner fails to:

Hold a hearing after application therefor under W.S.

26-2-125

; or

Make and enter his order on hearing as required by W.S.

26-2-128

.

All such appeals shall be taken as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] for contested cases.

This section does not prohibit recourse to injunction or other appropriate emergency proceedings in proper circumstances.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 146, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 57-304; C.S. 1945, § 52-204; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-51, 26.1-45; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 45; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

For decision construing former provision relating to review of commissioner's action,

see Farmers Auto. Inter-Insurance Exch. v. MacDonald, 59 Wyo. 352, 140 P.2d 905,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1943).

Law reviews. —

See “Scope of Review of Decision of an Administrative Agency in Wyoming,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 65 (1954).

See note, “De Novo Judicial Review of Wyoming Administrative Findings,” 15 Wyo. L.J. 67 (1960).

§ 26-2-130.
Cease and desist authority.

The commissioner may issue a cease and desist order if:

It appears from specific facts shown by affidavit that a person, as defined by W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xx), is engaging in any act or practice prohibited under this code which is causing or can be reasonably expected to cause significant, imminent and irreparable injury to the insuring public; and

That the department has either discussed the matter with the person or has made a good-faith attempt to do so.

Upon issuance of a cease and desist order, the commissioner shall serve upon the person affected by the order, by personal service as defined in rule 4 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, or by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person’s last known address, an order specifically stating the acts complained of and requiring the person to immediately cease and desist from the act, methods or practices stated. The cease and desist order shall have full force and effect as soon as it is received unless stayed by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. The cease and desist order shall be of no effect at the end of the second business day following its issuance unless the commissioner shall have obtained a temporary restraining order, pursuant to rule 65 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure or the person receiving the order shall have stipulated that it remain in effect pursuant to terms and conditions agreed upon by the commissioner and that person. Thereafter, the commissioner may seek such further orders of the court to enforce the cease and desist order as he deems appropriate or necessary. If a temporary restraining order is sought in accordance with this subsection, the cease and desist order shall remain in effect until the temporary restraining order or any extension thereof is denied, or until the cease and desist order is modified or stayed by an order of the court. The action seeking the temporary restraining order shall be filed in the district court for Laramie county or in the district court for the county in which person affected by the order resides or has his principal place of business.

If the person affected by the cease and desist order seeks to contest the order, the person shall request a hearing before the commissioner not later than ten (10) days after the date on which the person received the order. A request to contest an order shall be in writing, served upon the commissioner by personal service as defined in rule 4 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, or by registered or certified mail, and shall state the grounds for the request to set aside or modify the order.

On receiving the request for a hearing, the commissioner shall serve notice of the time and place of the hearing at which the person requesting the hearing shall have the opportunity to show cause why the order should not be affirmed. The hearing shall be held within ten (10) days from the date the request for hearing is received unless mutually waived by the parties or continuance granted by the commissioner for good cause. The cease and desist order shall continue in full force and effect while the hearing is pending unless the order is stayed by the commissioner.

The hearing on the order shall be conducted according to the procedures for contested cases under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Within two (2) working days after the hearing, the commissioner shall affirm, modify or set aside, in whole or in part, the cease and desist order.

A cease and desist order shall be final eleven (11) days after the date the order is received by the person if a hearing as provided by subsection (c) of this section is not requested by the person affected by the order.

Any person violating a cease and desist order issued under this section shall be assessed a civil penalty as provided by W.S. 26-1-107(b). If the commissioner reasonably believes that a person has violated a cease and desist order issued under this section, the commissioner may initiate judicial proceedings to enjoin further violation of the order in the district court for Laramie county or in the district court for the county in which the person resides or has his principal place of business.

The commissioner may promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to carry out the purpose of this section.

Any final order, ruling, finding, decision or other act of the commissioner made pursuant to this chapter or this section shall be subject to judicial review in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 126, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 26-2-131.
Immunity from liability.

No cause of action shall arise nor shall any liability be imposed against the commissioner, the commissioner’s authorized representatives or any examiner appointed by the commissioner for any statements made or conduct performed in good faith while carrying out an examination or related activity under the provisions of this chapter.

No cause of action shall arise nor shall any liability be imposed against any person for the act of communicating or delivering information or data to the commissioner, the commissioner’s authorized representative or examiner or law enforcement agencies pursuant to an examination made under this chapter or any other criminal investigation under title 6 of the Wyoming statutes, if the act of communication or delivery was performed in good faith and without fraudulent intent.

Any person identified in subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall be entitled to an award of attorney’s fees and costs if he is a prevailing party in a civil cause of action for libel, slander or any other relevant tort arising out of activities in carrying out an examination or related activity under the provisions of this chapter and the party bringing the action was not substantially justified in doing so. For purposes of this section, a proceeding is “substantially justified” if it had a reasonable basis in law or fact at the time it was initiated.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 59, § 1; 2012, ch. 44, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (b), inserted “or law enforcement agencies” and “or any other criminal investigation under title 6 of the Wyoming statutes”; and inserted “or (b)” in (c).

§ 26-2-132.
Health benefits plan committee. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 94, § 1; repealed by 2022 ch. 55, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 26-2-133.
Disclosure of nonpublic personal information; rulemaking; rulemaking authority limited.

The commissioner is authorized to adopt rules necessary to govern the practices of all persons licensed under this code with respect to the disclosure of nonpublic personal financial and health information of insurance consumers and customers. The rules shall prohibit the disclosure of any nonpublic personal information contrary to the provisions of title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999, P.L. 106-102.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 43, § 1.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 202, § 1; 2007, ch. 43, § 1.

Federal law. —

Title V of the Gramm-Leach Bliley Act of 1999, P.L. 106-102, is codified as 15 U.S.C.S. § 6801 et seq.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former subsection (b), which read: “Unless specifically reauthorized by the legislature prior to July 1, 2007, rules and regulations promulgated under subsection (a) of this section prior to July 1, 2007, shall on and after July 1, 2007, be null and void and of no effect and shall not be enforceable.”

§ 26-2-134.
Limiting the use of credit scoring; rulemaking.

The commissioner is authorized to adopt rules as necessary to govern the practices of all persons licensed under this code with respect to the use of credit scoring in the underwriting of personal lines, motor vehicles and homeowner policies. The rules shall provide:

That a person’s credit history or scoring shall not be the sole basis to cancel, deny or nonrenew an insurance policy. An insurer may use credit history only in combination with other valid underwriting factors independent of credit history or score;

That an insurer shall provide notice to the person when credit scoring is being used to underwrite a policy and when use of credit scoring is adverse to the person;

That the consumer is adequately protected against unfair discrimination in the use of credit scoring to underwrite policies.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 102, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to in this section, see § 26-1-102(a)(xxxii).